California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(ii) Subject to subparagraph (E), any repayment amounts that were unallocated to hospitals due to the limitation in clause (iii) shall be allocated in a second stage among each of the remaining designated public hospitals that has not reached its applicable repayment limit, including the hospitals that were not subject to the allocations under clause (i), based pro rata on the amounts determined and received by the hospital pursuant to subdivision (e), except that no repayment amount for a hospital shall exceed the limitation under clause (iii). The pro rata allocation process will be repeated in subsequent stages with respect to any repayment amounts that cannot be allocated in a prior stage to hospitals due to the limitation under clause (iii), until the entire federal repayment amount has been allocated among the hospitals.

(iii) The repayment amount allocated to a designated public hospital pursuant to this subparagraph shall not exceed an amount equal to the percentage of the combined payments determined and received by the hospital pursuant to subdivision (e) that is twice the percentage computed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4).

(E) Notwithstanding any other law, if the affiliated governmental entity for the designated public hospital is a county subject to the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 17612.1) of Chapter 6 of Part 5, the department, in consultation with the affected designated public hospital, and the Department of Finance, shall determine how to account for whether any repayment amount determined for the designated public hospital pursuant to subparagraph (D) for the
 2013–14 and 2014–15 state fiscal years would otherwise have affected, if at all, the applicable county’s redirection obligation for the applicable state fiscal year pursuant to paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17612.3 and shall determine what adjustments, if any, are necessary to either the repayment amount or the applicable county’s redirection obligation. For purposes of this subparagraph, the provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 17612.2 and paragraph (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 101853 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply.

(g) The provisions of Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 14166) shall remain in effect until all payments authorized pursuant to that article have been paid, finalized, and settled, and to the extent its provisions are retained for purposes of this article or Article 5.51 (commencing
 with Section 14184.100).

(h) For purposes of this article, commencing January 1, 2021, and thereafter, any references to “Designated Public Hospital,” “CalAIM term,” or “CalAIM Terms and Conditions” have the same meanings as set forth in Section 14184.101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 400.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.40.

(a) (1) The department shall implement the Global Payment Program authorized under the demonstration project to support participating public health care systems that provide health care services for the uninsured. Under the Global Payment Program, GPP systems receive global payments based on the health care they provide to the uninsured, in lieu of traditional disproportionate share hospital payments and safety net care pool payments previously made available pursuant to Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 14166).

(2) The Global Payment Program is intended to streamline funding sources for care for California’s remaining uninsured population, creating a
 value-based mechanism to increase incentives to provide primary and preventive care services and other high-value services. The Global Payment Program supports GPP systems for their key role providing and promoting effective, higher value services to California’s remaining uninsured. Promoting more cost-effective and higher value care means that the payment structure rewards the provision of care in more appropriate venues for patients, and will support structural changes to the care delivery system that will improve the options for treating both Medi-Cal and uninsured patients.

(3) Under the Global Payment Program, GPP systems will receive Global Payment Program payments calculated using an innovative value-based point methodology that incorporates measures of value for the patient in conjunction with the recognition of costs. To
 receive the full amount of Global Payment Program payments, a GPP system shall provide a threshold level of services, as measured in the point methodology described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and based on the GPP system’s historical volume, cost, and mix of services. This payment methodology is intended to support GPP systems that continue to provide services to the uninsured, while incentivizing the GPP systems to shift the overall delivery of services for the uninsured to provide more cost-effective, higher value care.

(4) The department shall implement and oversee the operation of the Global Payment Program in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions and the requirements of this section, to maximize the amount of federal financial participation available to participating GPP systems.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “GPP system” means a public health care system that consists of a designated public hospital, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 14184.10 but excluding the hospitals operated by the University of California, except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14184.300, and its affiliated and contracted providers. Multiple designated public hospitals operated by a single legal entity may belong to the same GPP system, to the extent set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions.

(2) “GPP program year” means a state fiscal year beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 during which the Global Payment Program is authorized under the
 demonstration project, beginning with state fiscal year 2015–16, and, as applicable, each state fiscal year thereafter through 2019–20, and any years or partial years during which the Global Payment Program is authorized under an extension or successor to the demonstration project.

(c) (1) For each GPP program year, the department shall determine the Global Payment Program’s aggregate annual limit, which is the maximum amount of funding available under the demonstration project for the Global Payment Program and which is the sum of the components described in subparagraphs (A) and (B). To the extent feasible, the aggregate annual limit shall be determined and made available by the department before the implementation of a GPP program year, and shall be updated and adjusted as necessary to reflect changes or adjustments to
 the amount of funding available for the Global Payment Program.

(A) A portion of the federal disproportionate share allotment specified for California under Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code shall be included as a component of the aggregate annual limit for each GPP program year. The amount of this portion shall equal the state’s total computable disproportionate share allotment reduced by the maximum amount of funding projected for payments pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14184.30 to disproportionate share hospitals that are not participating in the Global Payment Program. For purposes of this determination, the federal disproportionate share allotment shall be aligned with the GPP program year in which the applicable federal fiscal year commences.

(B) The aggregate annual limit shall also include the amount authorized under the demonstration project for the uncompensated care component of the Global Payment Program for the applicable GPP program year, as determined pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions.

(2) The department shall develop a methodology for valuing health care services and activities provided to the uninsured that achieves the goals of the Global Payment Program, including those values set forth in subdivision (a) and as expressed in the Special Terms and Conditions. The points assigned to a particular service or activity shall be the same across all GPP systems. Points for specific services or activities may be increased or decreased over time as the Global Payment Program progresses, to incentivize appropriate
 changes in the mix of services provided to the uninsured. To the extent necessary, the department shall obtain federal approval for the methodology and any applicable changes to the methodology.

(3) For each GPP system, the department shall perform a baseline analysis of the GPP system’s historical volume, cost, and mix of services to the uninsured to establish an annual threshold for purposes of the Global Payment Program. The annual threshold shall be measured in points established through the methodology developed pursuant to paragraph (2) and as set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions.

(4) The department shall determine a pro rata allocation percentage for each GPP system by dividing the GPP system’s annual threshold determined in paragraph (3) by the sum of all GPP
 systems’ thresholds.

(5) For each GPP system, the department shall determine an annual budget the GPP system will receive if it achieves its threshold. A GPP system’s annual budget shall equal the allocation percentage determined in paragraph (4) for the GPP system, multiplied by the Global Payment Program’s aggregate annual limit determined in paragraph (1).

(6) If there is a change in the aggregate annual limit, the department shall adjust and recalculate each GPP system’s annual threshold or the annual budget in proportion to changes in the aggregate annual limit calculated in paragraph (1) in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions.

(d) The amount of Global Payment Program funding payable to a GPP
 system for a GPP program year shall be calculated as follows, subject to the Special Terms and Conditions:

(1) The full amount of a GPP system’s annual budget shall be payable to the GPP system if the services it provided to the uninsured during the GPP program year, as measured and scored using the point methodology described under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), meets or exceeds its threshold for a given year. For GPP systems that do not achieve their threshold, the amount payable to the GPP system shall equal its annual budget reduced by the proportion by which it fell short of its threshold.

(2) The department shall develop a methodology to redistribute unearned Global Payment Program funds for a given GPP program year to those GPP systems that exceeded their respective threshold
 for that same year. To the extent sufficient funds are available for all qualifying GPP systems, the GPP system’s redistributed amount shall equal the GPP system’s annual budget multiplied by the percentage by which the GPP system exceeded its threshold, and any remaining amounts of unearned funds will remain undistributed. If sufficient funds are unavailable to make all these payments to qualifying GPP systems, the amounts of these additional payments will be reduced for all qualifying GPP systems by the same proportion, so that the full amount of unearned Global Payment Program funds are redistributed. Redistributed payment amounts calculated pursuant to this paragraph shall be added to the amounts payable to a GPP system calculated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The department shall specify a reporting schedule for participating
 GPP systems to submit an interim yearend report and a final reconciliation report for each GPP program year. The interim yearend report and the final reconciliation report shall identify the services the GPP system provided to the uninsured during the GPP program year, the associated point calculation, and the amount of payments earned by the GPP system before any redistribution. The method and format of the reporting shall be established by the department, consistent with the approved Special Terms and Conditions.

(4) Payments shall be made in the manner and within the timeframes as follows, except if one or more GPP systems fail to provide the intergovernmental transfer amount determined pursuant to subdivision (g) by the date specified in this paragraph, the timeframe for the associated payments shall be extended to the extent
 necessary to allow the department to timely process the payments. In no event, however, shall payment be delayed beyond 21 days after all the necessary intergovernmental transfers have been made.

(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), for each of the first three quarters of a GPP program year the department shall notify GPP systems of their payment amounts and intergovernmental transfer amounts and make a quarterly interim payment equal to 25 percent of each GPP system’s annual global budget to the GPP system.

(i) For quarters ending September 30, the payment amount and intergovernmental transfer amount notice shall be sent by September 15, intergovernmental transfers shall be due by September 22, and payments shall be made by October 15.

(ii) For quarters ending December 31, the payment amount and intergovernmental transfer amount notice shall be sent by December 15, intergovernmental transfers shall be due by December 22, and payments shall be made by January 15.

(iii) For quarters ending March 31, the payment amount and intergovernmental transfer amount notice shall be sent by March 15, intergovernmental transfers shall be due by March 22, and payments shall be made by April 15.

(B) For the 2015–16 GPP program year, the department shall make the quarterly interim payments described in subdivision (a) in a single interim payment for the first three quarters as soon as practicable following approval of the Global Payment Program protocols as part of
 the Special Terms and Conditions and receipt of the associated intergovernmental transfers. The amount of this interim payment that is otherwise payable to a GPP system shall be reduced by the payments described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 14184.30 that were received by a designated public hospital affiliated with the GPP system.

(C) By September 15 following the end of each GPP program year, the department shall determine and notify each GPP system of the amount the GPP system earned for the GPP program year pursuant to paragraph (1) based on its interim yearend report, the amount of additional interim payments necessary to bring the GPP system’s aggregate interim payments for the GPP program year to that amount, and the transfer amounts calculated pursuant to subdivision (g). If the GPP system has earned less than 75
 percent of its annual budget, no additional interim payment will be made for the GPP program year. Intergovernmental transfer amounts shall be due by September 22 following the end of the GPP program year, and interim payments shall be made by October 15 following the end of each GPP program year. All interim payments shall be subject to reconciliation after the submission of the final reconciliation report.

(D) By June 30 following the end of each GPP program year, the department shall review the final reconciliation reports and determine and notify each GPP system of the final amounts earned by the GPP system for the GPP program year pursuant to paragraph (1), as well as the redistribution amounts, if any, pursuant to paragraph (2), the amount of the payment adjustments or recoupments necessary to reconcile interim payments to those
 amounts, and the transfer amount pursuant to subdivision (g). Intergovernmental transfer amounts shall be due by July 14 following the notification, and final reconciliation payments for the GPP program year shall be made no later than August 15 following this notification.

(e) The Global Payment Program provides a source of funding for GPP systems to support their ability to make health care activities and services available to the uninsured, and shall not constitute or offer health care coverage for individuals receiving services. Global Payment Program payments are not paid on behalf of specific individuals, and participating GPP systems may determine the scope, type, and extent to which services are available, to the extent consistent with the Special Terms and Conditions. The operation of the Global Payment Program
 shall
 not decrease, expand, or otherwise alter the scope of a county’s obligations to the medically indigent pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 9.

(f) The nonfederal share of any payments under the Global Payment Program shall consist of voluntary intergovernmental transfers of funds provided by designated public hospitals or affiliated governmental agencies or entities, in accordance with this section or Section 14184.300.

(1) The Global Payment Program Special Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys deposited in the Global Payment Program Special Fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for the purposes specified in
 this section or Section 14184.300. All funds derived pursuant to this section or Section 14184.300 shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Global Payment Program Special Fund.

(2) The Global Payment Program Special Fund shall consist of moneys that a designated public hospital or affiliated governmental agency or entity elects to transfer to the department for deposit into the fund as a condition of participation in the Global Payment Program, to the extent permitted under Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Special Terms and Conditions, and any other applicable federal Medicaid laws. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), moneys derived from these intergovernmental transfers in the Global Payment Program Special Fund shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of Global Payment
 Program payments authorized under the demonstration project. Any intergovernmental transfer of funds provided for purposes of the Global Payment Program shall be made as specified in this section or Section 14184.300. Upon providing any intergovernmental transfer of funds, each transferring entity shall certify that the transferred funds qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to applicable federal Medicaid laws and the Special Terms and Conditions, and in the form and manner as required by the department.

(3) The department shall claim federal financial participation for GPP payments using moneys derived from intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to this section or Section 14184.300, and deposited in the Global Payment Program Special Fund to the full extent permitted by law. The moneys disbursed from the fund, and 
 all associated federal financial participation, shall be distributed only to GPP systems and the governmental agencies or entities to which they are affiliated, as applicable. If federal financial participation is unavailable with respect to a payment under this section or Section 14184.300 and either is not obtained, or results in a recoupment of payments already made, the department shall return any intergovernmental transfer fund amounts associated with the payment for which federal financial participation is
 unavailable to the applicable transferring entities within 14 days from the date of the associated recoupment or other determination, as applicable.

(4) As a condition of participation in the Global Payment Program, each designated public hospital or affiliated governmental agency or entity, agrees to provide intergovernmental transfer of funds necessary to meet the nonfederal share obligation as calculated under subdivision (g) for Global Payment Program payments made pursuant to this section or Section 14184.300 and the Special Terms and Conditions. Any intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this section or Section 14184.300 shall be considered voluntary for purposes of all federal laws. No state General Fund moneys shall be used to fund the nonfederal share of any Global Payment Program payment.

(g) For each scheduled quarterly interim payment, interim yearend payment, and final reconciliation payment pursuant to subdivision (d), the department shall determine the intergovernmental transfer amount for each GPP system as follows:

(1) The department shall determine the amount of the quarterly interim payment, interim yearend payment, or final reconciliation payment, as applicable, that is payable to each GPP system pursuant to subdivision (d). For purposes of these determinations, the redistributed amounts described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) shall be disregarded.

(2) The department shall determine the aggregate amount of intergovernmental transfers necessary to fund the nonfederal share of the
 quarterly interim payment, interim yearend payment, or final reconciliation payment, as applicable, identified in paragraph (1) for all the GPP systems.

(3) With respect to each quarterly interim payment, interim yearend payment, or final yearend reconciliation payment, as applicable, an initial transfer amount shall be determined for each GPP system, calculated as the amount for the GPP system determined in paragraph (1), multiplied by the nonfederal share percentage, as defined in Section 14184.10, and multiplied by the applicable GPP system-specific IGT factor as follows:

(A) Los Angeles County Health System: 1.100.

(B) Alameda Health System: 1.137.

(C) Arrowhead Regional Medical Center: 0.923.

(D) Contra Costa Regional Medical Center: 0.502.

(E) Kern Medical Center: 0.581.

(F) Natividad Medical Center: 1.183.

(G) Riverside University Health System-Medical Center: 0.720.

(H) San Francisco General Hospital: 0.507.

(I) San Joaquin General Hospital: 0.803.

(J) San Mateo Medical Center: 1.325.

(K) Santa Clara Valley Medical Center: 0.706.

(L) Ventura County Medical Center: 1.401.

(4) The initial transfer amount for each GPP system determined under paragraph (3) shall be further adjusted as follows to ensure that sufficient intergovernmental transfers are available to make payments to all GPP systems:

(A) With respect to each quarterly interim payment, interim yearend payment, or final reconciliation payment, as applicable, the initial transfer amounts for all GPP systems determined under paragraph (3) shall be added together.

(B) The sum of the initial transfer amounts in subparagraph (A) shall be subtracted from the aggregate amount of intergovernmental transfers necessary to fund the payments as
 determined in paragraph (2). The resulting positive or negative amount shall be the aggregate positive or negative intergovernmental transfer adjustment.

(C) Each GPP system-specific IGT factor, as specified in subparagraphs (A) to (L), inclusive, of paragraph (3) shall be subtracted from 2.000, yielding an IGT adjustment factor for each GPP system.

(D) The IGT adjustment factor calculated in subparagraph (C) for each GPP system shall be multiplied by the positive or negative amount in subparagraph (B), and multiplied by the allocation percentage determined for the GPP system in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c), yielding the amount to be added or subtracted from the initial transfer amount determined in paragraph (3) for the applicable GPP system.

(E) The transfer amount to be paid by each GPP system with respect to the applicable quarterly interim payment, interim yearend payment, or final reconciliation payment, shall equal the initial transfer amount determined in paragraph (3) as adjusted by the amount determined in subparagraph (D).

(5) Upon the determination of the redistributed amounts described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) for the final reconciliation payment, the department shall, with respect to each GPP system that exceeded its respective threshold, determine the associated intergovernmental transfer amount equal to the nonfederal share that is necessary to draw down the additional payment, and shall include this amount in the GPP system’s transfer amount.

(h) The department may initiate audits of GPP systems’ data submissions and reports, and may request supporting documentation. Any audits conducted by the department shall be complete within 22 months of the end of the applicable GPP program year to allow for the appropriate finalization of payments to the participating GPP system, but subject to recoupment if it is later determined that federal financial participation is unavailable for any portion of the applicable payments.

(i) If the department determines, during the course of the demonstration term and in consultation with participating GPP systems, that the Global Payment Program should be terminated for subsequent years, the department shall terminate the Global Payment Program by notifying the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with the timeframes
 specified in the Special Terms and Conditions. In the event of this type of termination, the department shall issue a declaration terminating the Global Payment Program and shall work with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to finalize all remaining payments under the Global Payment Program. Subsequent to the effective date for any termination accomplished pursuant to this subdivision, the designated public hospitals that participated in the Global Payment Program shall claim and receive disproportionate share hospital payments, if eligible, as described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14184.30, but only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(j) Commencing January 1, 2021, the
 Global Payment Program shall be continued as modified pursuant to Section 14184.300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 401.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.41.

The department shall conduct, or arrange to have conducted, the two evaluations of the Global Payment Program methodology required under the Special Terms and Conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   (AB 1568)   Effective July 1, 2016.   Operative July 25, 2016, pursuant to Stats. 2016, Ch. 42, Sec. 8, and enactment of SB 815 as Ch. 111.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.50.

(a) (1) The department shall establish and operate the Public Hospital Redesign and Incentives in Medi-Cal (PRIME) program to build upon the foundational delivery system transformation work, expansion of coverage, and increased access to coordinated primary care achieved through the prior California’s “Bridge to Reform” Medicaid demonstration project. The activities supported by the PRIME program are designed to accelerate efforts by participating PRIME entities to change care delivery to maximize health care value and strengthen their ability to successfully perform under risk-based alternative payment models in the long term and consistent with the demonstration’s goals. Participating PRIME entities consist of two types of entities: designated public hospital systems and district and municipal public
 hospitals.

(2) Participating PRIME entities shall be eligible to earn incentive payments by undertaking projects set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions, for which there are required project metrics and targets. Additionally, a minimum number of required projects is specified for each designated public hospital system.

(3) The department shall provide participating PRIME entities the opportunity to earn the maximum amount of funds authorized for the PRIME program under the demonstration project. Under the demonstration project, funding is available for the designated public hospital systems and the district and municipal public hospitals through two separate pools. Subject to the Special Terms and Conditions, up to one billion four hundred million dollars ($1,400,000,000) is authorized annually for the designated public hospital systems pool, and up to two hundred million
 dollars ($200,000,000) is authorized annually for the district and municipal public hospitals pool, during the first three years of the demonstration project, with reductions to these amounts in the fourth and fifth years. Except in those limited instances specifically authorized by the Special Terms and Conditions, the funding that is authorized for each respective pool shall only be available to participating PRIME entities within that pool.

(4) PRIME payments shall be incentive payments, and are not payments for services otherwise reimbursable under the Medi-Cal program, nor direct reimbursement for expenditures incurred by participating PRIME entities in implementing reforms. PRIME incentive payments shall not offset payment amounts otherwise payable by the Medi-Cal program, or to and by Medi-Cal managed care plans for services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, or otherwise supplant provider payments payable to PRIME entities.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Alternative payment methodology” or “APM” means a payment made from a Medi-Cal managed care plan to a designated public hospital system for services covered for a beneficiary assigned to a designated public hospital system that meets the conditions set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions and approved by the department, as applicable.

(2) “Designated public hospital system” means a designated public hospital, as listed in the Special Terms and Conditions, and its affiliated governmental providers and contracted governmental and nongovernmental entities that constitute a system with an approved project plan under the PRIME program. A single designated public hospital system may include multiple designated public hospitals under common government
 ownership.

(3) “District and municipal public hospitals” means those nondesignated public hospitals, as listed in the Special Terms and Conditions, that have an approved project plan under the PRIME program.

(4) “Participating PRIME entity” means a designated public hospital system or district and municipal public hospital participating in the PRIME program.

(5) “PRIME program year” means the state fiscal year beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 during which the PRIME program is authorized, except that the first PRIME program year shall commence on January 1, 2016, and, as applicable, means each state fiscal year thereafter through the 2019–20 state fiscal year, and any years or partial years during which the PRIME program is authorized under an extension or successor to the demonstration project.

(c) (1) Within 30 days following federal approval of the protocols setting forth the PRIME projects, metrics, and funding mechanics, each participating PRIME entity shall submit a five-year PRIME project plan containing the specific elements required in the Special Terms and Conditions. The department shall review all five-year PRIME project plans and take action within 60 days to approve or disapprove each five-year PRIME project plan.

(2) Participating PRIME entities may modify projects or metrics in their five-year PRIME project plan, to the extent authorized under the demonstration project and approved by the department.

(d) (1) Each participating PRIME entity shall submit reports to the department twice a year demonstrating progress toward required metric targets. A
 standardized report form shall be developed jointly by the department and participating PRIME entities for this purpose. The mid-year report shall be due March 31 of each PRIME program year, except that, for the 2015–16 project year only, the submission of an acceptable five-year PRIME project plan in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions shall constitute the submission of the mid-year report. The yearend report shall be due September 30 following each PRIME program year.

(2) The submission of the project reports pursuant to paragraph (1) shall constitute a request for payment. Amounts payable to the participating PRIME entity shall be determined based on the achievement of the metric targets included in the mid-year report and yearend report, as applicable.

(3) Within 14 days following the submission of the mid-year and yearend reports, the department shall confirm the
 amounts payable to participating PRIME entities and shall issue requests to each participating PRIME entity for the intergovernmental transfer amounts necessary to draw down the federal funding for the applicable PRIME incentive payment to that entity.

(A) Any intergovernmental transfers provided for purposes of this section shall be deposited in the Public Hospital Investment, Improvement, and Incentive Fund established pursuant to Section 14182.4 and retained pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(B) Participating PRIME entities or their affiliated governmental agencies or entities shall make the intergovernmental transfer to the department within seven days of receiving the department’s request. In the event federal approval for a payment is not obtained, the department shall return the intergovernmental transfer funds to the transferring entity within 14 days.

(C) PRIME payments to a participating PRIME entity shall be conditioned upon the department’s receipt of the intergovernmental transfer amount from the applicable entity. If the intergovernmental transfer is made within the appropriate timeframe, the incentive payment shall be disbursed in accordance with paragraph (4), otherwise the payment shall be disbursed within 14 days of when the intergovernmental transfer is provided.

(4) Subject to paragraph (3), and except with respect to the 2015–16 project year, amounts payable based on the mid-year reports shall be paid no later than April 30, and amounts payable based on the yearend report shall be paid no later than October 31. In the event of insufficient or misreported data, these payment deadlines may be extended up to 60 days to allow time for the reports to be adequately corrected for approval for payment. If corrected data is not
 submitted to enable payment to be made within the extended timeframe, the participating entity shall not receive PRIME payment for the period in question. For the 2015–16 project year only, 25 percent of the annual allocation for the participating PRIME entity shall be payable within 14 days following the approval of the five-year PRIME project plan. The remaining 75 percent of the participating PRIME entity’s annual allocation shall be available following the 2015–16 yearend report, subject to the requirements in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(5) The department shall draw down the federal funding and pay both the nonfederal and federal shares of the incentive payment to the participating PRIME entity, to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(e) The amount of PRIME incentive payments payable to a participating PRIME entity shall be determined as
 follows:

(1) The department shall allocate the full amount of annual funding authorized under the PRIME project pools across all domains, projects, and metrics undertaken in the manner set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions. Separate allocations shall be determined for the designated public hospital system pool and the district and municipal hospital pool. The allocations shall determine the aggregate annual amount of funding that may be earned for each domain, project, and metric for all participating PRIME entities within the appropriate pool.

(A) The department shall allocate the aggregate annual amounts determined for each project and metric under the designated public hospital system pool among participating designated public hospital systems through an allocation methodology that takes into account available system-specific data, primarily based on the unique number
 of Medi-Cal beneficiaries treated, consistent with the Special Terms and Conditions. For the 2015−16 project year only, the approval of the five-year PRIME project plans for designated public hospital systems will be considered an appropriate metric target and will equal up to 25 percent of a designated public hospital system’s annual allocation for that year.

(B) The department shall allocate the aggregate annual amounts determined for each project and metric under the district and municipal public hospital system pool among participating district and municipal public hospital systems through an allocation methodology that takes into account available system-specific data that includes Medi-Cal and uninsured care, the number of projects being undertaken, and a baseline floor funding amount, consistent with the Special Terms and Conditions. For the 2015–16 project year only, the approval of the five-year PRIME project plans for district and
 municipal public hospital systems will be considered an appropriate metric target and will equal up to 25 percent of a district and municipal public hospital system’s annual allocation for that year.

(2) Amounts payable to each participating PRIME entity shall be determined using the methodology described in the Special Terms and Conditions, based on the participating PRIME entity’s progress toward and achievement of the established metrics and targets, as reflected in the mid-year and yearend reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(A) Each participating PRIME entity shall be individually responsible for progress toward and achievement of project specific metric targets during the reporting period.

(B) The amounts allocated pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) shall
 represent the amounts the designated public hospital system or district and municipal public hospital, as applicable, may earn through achievement of a designated project metric target for the applicable year, before any redistribution.

(C) Participating PRIME entities shall earn reduced payment for partial achievement at both the mid-year and yearend reports, as described in the Special Terms and Conditions.

(3) If, at the end of a project year, a project metric target is not fully met by a participating PRIME entity and that entity is not able to fully claim funds that otherwise would have been earned for meeting the metric target, participating PRIME entities shall have the opportunity to earn unclaimed funds under the redistribution methodology established under the Special Terms and Conditions. Amounts earned by a participating PRIME entity through redistribution shall be
 payable in addition to the amounts earned pursuant to paragraph (2).

(f) The nonfederal share of payments under the PRIME program shall consist of voluntary intergovernmental transfers of funds provided by designated public hospitals or affiliated governmental agencies or entities, or district and municipal public hospitals or affiliated governmental agencies or entities, in accordance with this section.

(1) The Public Hospital Investment, Improvement, and Incentive Fund, established in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 14182.4, shall be retained during the demonstration term for purposes of making PRIME payments to participating PRIME entities. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys deposited in the Public Hospital Investment, Improvement, and Incentive Fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for the
 purposes specified in this section. All funds derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Public Hospital Investment, Improvement, and Incentive Fund.
